Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Sec. 45.29.101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 35.

Construction and effect of UCC Art. 9, dealing with secured transactions, sales of accounts, contract rights, and chattel paper, 30 ALR3d 9; 67 ALR3d 308; 69 ALR3d 1162; 76 ALR3d 11; 99 ALR3d 807; 99 ALR3d 1080; 100 ALR3d 10; 100 ALR3d 940; 7 ALR4th 308; 11 ALR4th 241; 90 ALR4th 859; 25 ALR5th 696.

Consignment transactions under the Uniform Commercial Code, 40 ALR3d 1078.

Effectiveness of original financing statement under UCC Art. 9 after change of debtor’s name, identity, or business structure, 99 ALR3d 1194.

Sec. 45.29.102.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“accession” means goods that are physically united with other goods in a manner so that the identity of the original goods is not lost;

“account,” except as used in “account for,”

means a right to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by performance,

for property that has been or is to be sold, leased, licensed, assigned, or otherwise disposed of;

for services rendered or to be rendered;

for a policy of insurance issued or to be issued;

for a secondary obligation incurred or to be incurred;

for energy provided or to be provided;

for the use or hire of a vessel under a charter or other contract;

arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card; or

as winnings in a lottery or other game of chance operated or sponsored by a state, a governmental unit of a state, or a person licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or a governmental unit of a state;

includes health care insurance receivables;

does not include rights to payment evidenced by chattel paper or by an instrument, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, investment property, letter-of-credit rights or letters of credit, or rights to payment for money or funds advanced or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card;

“account debtor” means a person obligated on an account, chattel paper, or general intangible, except that “account debtor” does not include persons obligated to pay a negotiable instrument even if the instrument constitutes part of chattel paper;

“accounting,” except as used in “accounting for,” means a record

authenticated by a secured party;

indicating the aggregate unpaid secured obligations as of a date not more than 35 days earlier or 35 days later than the date of the record; and

identifying the components of the obligations in reasonable detail;

“agricultural lien” means an interest, other than a security interest, in farm products

that secures payment or performance of an obligation for

goods or services furnished in connection with a debtor’s farming operation; or

rent on real property leased by a debtor in connection with the debtor’s farming operation;

that is created by statute in favor of a person who

in the ordinary course of its business, furnished goods or services to a debtor in connection with the debtor’s farming operation; or

leased real property to a debtor in connection with the debtor’s farming operation; and

whose effectiveness does not depend on the person’s possession of the personal property;

“applicant” has the meaning given in AS

45.05.102(a)

;

“as-extracted collateral” means

oil, gas, or other minerals that are subject to a security interest that

is created by a debtor having an interest in the minerals before extraction; and

attaches to the minerals as extracted; or

accounts arising out of the sale at the wellhead or minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in which the debtor had an interest before extraction;

“authenticate” means

to sign; or

with present intent to adopt or accept a record, to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process;

“bank” means an organization that is engaged in the business of banking, including a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company;

“beneficiary” has the meaning given in AS

45.05.102(a)

;

“broker” has the meaning given in AS

45.08.102(a)

;

“cash proceeds” means proceeds that are money, checks, deposit accounts, or the like;

“certificate of title” means

a certificate of title with respect to which a statute provides for the security interest in question to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral;

a record, other than a certificate of title described in (A) of this paragraph, maintained as an alternative to a certificate of title by the governmental unit that issues certificates of title if a statute permits the security interest in question to be indicated on the record as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral;

“certificated security” has the meaning given in AS

45.08.102(a)

;

“chattel paper” means a record or records that evidence both a monetary obligation and a security interest in specific goods, a security interest in specific goods and software used in the goods, a security interest in specific goods and license of software used in the goods, a lease of specific goods, or a lease of specific goods and license of software used in the goods, except that “chattel paper” does not include charters or other contracts involving the use or hire of a vessel, or records that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card; if a transaction is evidenced by records that include an instrument or series of instruments, the group of records taken together constitutes chattel paper; in this paragraph, “monetary obligation” means a monetary obligation secured by the goods or owed under a lease of the goods, and includes a monetary obligation with respect to software used in the goods;

“check” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.104(f)

;

“collateral” means the property subject to a security interest or agricultural lien, including

proceeds to which a security interest attaches;

accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and promissory notes that have been sold; and

goods that are the subject of a consignment;

“commercial tort claim” means a claim arising in tort with respect to which the claimant is

an organization; or

an individual and the claim

arose in the course of the claimant’s business or profession; and

does not include damages arising out of personal injury to or the death of an individual;

“commodity account” means an account maintained by a commodity intermediary in which a commodity contract is carried for a commodity customer;

“commodity contract” means a commodity futures contract, an option on a commodity futures contract, a commodity option, or another contract if the contract or option is traded on

or subject to the rules of a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market for the contract under federal commodities laws; or

a foreign commodity board of trade, exchange, or market and is carried on the books of a commodity intermediary for a commodity customer;

“commodity customer” means a person for whom a commodity intermediary carries a commodity contract on its books;

“commodity intermediary” means a person who

is registered as a futures commission merchant under federal commodities law; or

in the ordinary course of its business, provides clearance or settlement services for a board of trade that has been designated as a contract market under federal commodities laws;

“communicate” means

to send a written or other tangible record;

to transmit a record by any means agreed upon by the persons sending and receiving the record; or

in the case of transmission of a record to or by a filing office, to transmit a record by any means prescribed by filing office regulation;

“consignee” means a merchant to whom goods are delivered in a consignment;

“consignment” means a transaction, regardless of its form, in which a person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of sale and

the merchant

deals in goods of that kind under a name other than the name of the person making delivery;

is not an auctioneer; and

is not generally known by the merchant’s creditors to be substantially engaged in selling the goods of others;

with respect to each delivery, the aggregate value of the goods is $1,000 or more at the time of delivery;

the goods are not consumer goods immediately before delivery; and

the transaction does not create a security interest that secures an obligation;

“consignor” means a person who delivers goods to a consignee in a consignment;

“consumer goods” means goods that are used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

“consumer goods transaction” means a consumer transaction in which

an individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; and

a security interest in consumer goods secures the obligation;

“consumer obligor” means an obligor who is an individual and who incurred the obligation as part of a transaction entered into primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

“consumer transaction” means a transaction, including a consumer goods transaction, in which

an individual incurs an obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

a security interest secures the obligation; and

the collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

“continuation statement” means an amendment of a financing statement that

identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

indicates that it is a continuation statement for, or that it is filed to continue the effectiveness of, the identified financing statement;

“contract for sale” has the meaning given in AS

45.02.106(a)

;

“control” has the meaning given in AS

45.07.116

;

“customer” has the meaning given in AS

45.04.104(a)

;

“debtor” means

a person having an interest, other than a security interest or other lien, in the collateral whether or not the person is an obligor;

a seller of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes; or

a consignee;

“deposit account” means a demand, time, savings, passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank except that the term does not include investment property or accounts evidenced by an instrument;

“document” means a document of title or a receipt of the type described in AS

45.07.201(b)

;

“electronic chattel paper” means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records consisting of information stored in an electronic medium;

“encumbrance” means a right, other than an ownership interest, in real property, including mortgages and other liens on real property;

“entitlement holder” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“equipment” means goods other than inventory, farm products, or consumer goods;

“farm products” means goods, other than standing timber, with respect to which the debtor is engaged in a farming operation and that are

crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including

crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes; and

aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;

supplies used or produced in a farming operation; or

products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured states;

“farming operation” means raising, cultivating, propagating, fattening, grazing, or other farming, livestock, or aquacultural operation;

“file number” means the number assigned to an initial financing statement under AS

45.29.519(a)

;

“filing office” means an office designated in AS

45.29.501

as the place to file a financing statement;

“filing office regulation” means a regulation adopted under AS

44.37.027

;

“financial asset” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“financing statement” means a record or records composed of an initial financing statement and any filed record relating to the initial financing statement;

“fixture filing” means the filing of a financing statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and satisfying AS

45.29.502(a)

and (b), including the filing of a financing statement covering goods of a transmitting utility that are or are to become fixtures;

“fixtures” means goods that have become so related to particular real property that an interest in them arises under real property law;

“general intangible” means personal property, including payment intangibles, software, and things in action, other than accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, goods, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of credit, money, and, before extraction, oil, gas, or other minerals;

[Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

“goods” means things that are movable when a security interest attaches; the term includes (A) fixtures; (B) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a conveyance or contract for sale; (C) the unborn young of animals; (D) crops grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the crops are produced on trees, vines, or bushes; and (E) manufactured homes; the term also includes a computer program embedded in goods and supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program if the program is associated with the goods in such a manner that it customarily is considered part of the goods or if, by becoming the owner of the goods, a person acquires a right to use the program in connection with the goods; the term does not include a computer program embedded in goods that consist solely of the medium in which the program is embedded; the term also does not include accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, general intangibles, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of credit, money, or, before extraction, oil, gas, or other minerals;

“governmental unit” means

a subdivision, agency, department, county, parish, municipality, or other unit of the government of the United States, a state, or a foreign country;

an organization having a separate corporate existence if the organization is eligible to issue debt on which interest is exempt from income taxation under the laws of the United States;

“health care insurance receivable” means an interest in or claim under a policy of insurance that is a right to payment of a monetary obligation for health-care goods or services provided;

“holder in due course” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.302

;

“instrument” means a negotiable instrument or other writing that evidences a right to the payment of a monetary obligation and is not itself a security agreement or lease and is of a type that in ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery with any necessary endorsement or assignment; the term does not include

investment property;

letters of credit; or

writings that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card;

“inventory” means goods, other than farm products, that

are leased by a person as lessor;

are held by a person for sale or lease or to be furnished under a contract of service;

are furnished by a person under a contract of service; or

consist of raw materials, work in process, or materials used or consumed in a business;

“investment property” means a security, whether certificated or uncertificated, security entitlement, securities account, commodity contract, or commodity account;

“issuer,” with respect to a

letter of credit or letter-of-credit right, has the meaning given in AS 45.05.102(a);

security, has the meaning given in AS

45.08.201

;

document of title, has the meaning given in AS

45.07.112

;

“jurisdiction of organization,” with respect to a registered organization, means the jurisdiction under whose law the organization is formed or organized;

“lease,” “lease agreement,” “lease contract,” “leasehold interest,” “lessee,” “lessee in ordinary course of business,” “lessor,” and “lessor’s residual interest” have the meanings given in AS

45.12.103(a)

;

“letter of credit” has the meaning given in AS 45.05.102(a);

“letter-of-credit right” means a right to payment or performance under a letter of credit whether or not the beneficiary has demanded or is at the time entitled to demand payment or performance; the term does not include the right of a beneficiary to demand payment or performance under a letter of credit;

“lien creditor” means

a creditor who has acquired a lien on the property involved by attachment, levy, or the like;

an assignee for benefit of creditors from the time of assignment;

a trustee in bankruptcy from the date of the filing of the petition; or

a receiver in equity from the time of appointment;

“manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, that, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length, or, when erected on site, is 320 or more square feet, and that is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained in the structure; the term includes a structure that meets all of the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under 42 U.S.C.;

“manufactured home transaction” means a secured transaction

that creates a purchase money security interest in a manufactured home, other than a manufactured home held as inventory; or

in which a manufactured home, other than a manufactured home held as inventory, is the primary collateral;

“merchant” has the meaning given in AS

45.02.104(a)

;

“mortgage” means a consensual interest in real property, including fixtures, that secures payment or performance of an obligation;

“negotiable instrument” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.104

;

“new debtor” means a person who becomes bound as debtor under AS

45.29.203(d)

by a security agreement previously entered into by another person;

“new value” means (A) money; (B) money’s worth in property, services, or new credit; or (C) release by a transferee of an interest in property previously transferred to the transferee; the term does not include an obligation substituted for another obligation;

“nominated person” has the meaning given in AS 45.05.102(a);

“noncash proceeds” means proceeds other than cash proceeds;

“note” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.104

;

“obligor” means a person who, with respect to an obligation secured by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on the collateral, (A) owes payment or other performance of the obligation; (B) has provided property other than the collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation; or (C) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment or other performance of the obligation; the term does not include issuers or nominated persons under a letter of credit;

“original debtor,” except as used in AS

45.29.310(c)

, means a person who, as debtor, entered into a security agreement to which a new debtor has become bound under AS

45.29.203(d)

;

“payment intangible” means a general intangible under which the account debtor’s principal obligation is a monetary obligation;

“person related to,” with respect to an

individual, means

the spouse of the individual;

a brother, brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of the individual;

an ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual’s spouse; or

another relative, by blood or marriage, of the individual or the individual’s spouse who shares the same home with the individual;

an organization, means

a person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the organization;

an officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, the organization;

an officer or director of, or a person performing similar functions with respect to, a person described in (i) of this subparagraph;

the spouse of an individual described in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subparagraph; or

an individual who is related by blood or marriage to an individual described in (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subparagraph and shares the same home with the individual;

“proceeds,” except as used in AS

45.29.609(b)

, means the following property:

whatever is acquired upon the sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition of collateral;

whatever is collected on, or distributed on account of, collateral;

rights arising out of collateral;

to the extent of the value of collateral, claims arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or interference with the use of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to the collateral; or

to the extent of the value of collateral and to the extent payable to the debtor or the secured party, insurance payable by reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to the collateral;

“proceeds of the letter of credit” has the meaning given “proceeds of a letter of credit” in AS

45.05.114(a)

;

“promissory note” means an instrument that evidences a promise to pay a monetary obligation, does not evidence an order to pay, and does not contain an acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has received for deposit a sum of money or funds;

“proposal” means a record authenticated by a secured party that includes the terms on which the secured party is willing to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under AS

45.29.620

—

45.29.622

;

“prove” has the meaning given in AS

45.03.103(a)

;

“public organic record” means a record that is available to the public for inspection and that is

a record consisting of the record initially filed with or issued by a state or the United States to form or organize an organization and a record filed with or issued by the state or the United States that amends or restates the initial record;

an organic record of a business trust consisting of the record initially filed with a state and a record filed with the state that amends or restates the initial record if a statute of the state governing business trusts requires that the record be filed with the state; or

a record consisting of legislation enacted by the legislature of a state or the United States Congress that forms or organizes an organization, a record amending the legislation, and a record filed with or issued by the state or the United States that amends or restates the name of the organization;

“pursuant to a commitment,” with respect to an advance made or other value given by a secured party, means in accordance with a secured party’s obligation, whether or not a subsequent event of default or other event not within the secured party’s control has relieved or may relieve the secured party from its obligation;

“record,” except as used in “for record,” “of record,” “record or legal title,” and “record owner,” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“registered organization” means an organization formed or organized solely under the law of a single state or the United States by the filing of a public organic record with, the issuance of a public organic record by, or the enactment of legislation by the state or the United States, including a business trust that is formed or organized under the law of a single state if a statute of the state governing business trusts requires that the business trust’s organic record be filed with the state;

“sale” has the meaning given in AS

45.02.106(a)

;

“secondary obligor” means an obligor to the extent that

the obligor’s obligation is secondary; or

the obligor has a right of recourse with respect to an obligation secured by collateral against the debtor or another obligor, or property of either;

“secured party” means

a person in whose favor a security interest is created or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not an obligation to be secured is outstanding;

a person who holds an agricultural lien;

a consignor;

a person to which accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold;

a trustee, indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent, or other representative in whose favor a security interest or agricultural lien is created or provided for; or

a person who holds a security interest arising under AS

45.02.401

,

45.02.505

,

45.02.711(c)

, AS

45.04.210

, AS

45.05.118

, or AS

45.12.508(e)

;

“securities account” has the meaning given in AS

45.08.501(e)

;

“securities intermediary” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“security” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“security agreement” means an agreement that creates or provides for a security interest;

“security certificate” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“security entitlement” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a);

“send,” in connection with a record or notification, means to

deposit in the mail, deliver for transmission, or transmit by another usual means of communication, with postage or cost of transmission provided for, addressed to an address reasonable under the circumstances; or

cause the record or notification to be received within the time that it would have been received if properly sent under (A) of this paragraph;

“software” means a computer program and supporting information provided in connection with a transaction relating to the program; the term does not include a computer program that is included in the definition of “goods”;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“supporting obligation” means a letter-of-credit right or secondary obligation that supports the payment or performance of an account, chattel paper, a document, a general intangible, an instrument, or investment property;

“tangible chattel paper” means chattel paper evidenced by a record or records consisting of information that is inscribed on a tangible medium;

“termination statement” means an amendment of a financing statement that

identifies by its file number the initial financing statement to which it relates; and

indicates either that it is a termination statement or that the identified financing statement is no longer effective;

“transmitting utility” means a person primarily engaged in the business of

operating a railroad, subway, street railway, or trolley bus;

transmitting communications electrically, electromagnetically, or by light;

transmitting goods by pipeline or sewer; or

transmitting or producing and transmitting electricity, steam, gas, or water;

“uncertificated security” has the meaning given in AS 45.08.102(a).

In addition, AS 45.01 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am §§ 96, 97, 113 ch 44 SLA 2009; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

The paragraphs in this section were renumbered in 2006, 2009, and 2013 to retain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed (a)(51) (now (a)(52)), which read, “‘good faith’ means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing;”; added (a)(59)(C) (now (a)(60)(C)); added (a)(104) (now (a)(33)).

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a)(8)(B), which read “execute or otherwise adopt a symbol, or to encrypt or similarly process a record in whole or in part, with the present intent of the authenticating person to identify the person and adopt or accept a record”; added (a)(13)(B), and made a related change; in (a)(61), inserted “formed or” following “whose law the organization is”; rewrote (a)(87) (now (a)(88)), which read “‘registered organization’ means an organization organized solely under the law of a single state or the United States and as to which the state or the United States must maintain a public record showing the organization to have been organized”; added (a)(105) (now (a)(85)).

Sec. 45.29.103.
Purchase money security interest; application of payments; burden of establishing.

In this section,

“purchase money collateral” means goods or software that secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to that collateral; and

“purchase money obligation” means an obligation of an obligor incurred as all or part of the price of the collateral or for value given to enable the debtor to acquire rights in or the use of the collateral if the value is in fact so used.

A security interest in goods is a purchase money security interest

to the extent that the goods are purchase money collateral with respect to that security interest;

if the security interest is in inventory that is or was purchase money collateral, to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to other inventory in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest; and

to the extent that the security interest secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to software in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest.

A security interest in software is a purchase money security interest to the extent that the security interest also secures a purchase money obligation incurred with respect to goods in which the secured party holds or held a purchase money security interest if the debtor acquired its interest in the software

in an integrated transaction in which it acquired an interest in the goods; and

for the principal purpose of using the software in the goods.

The security interest of a consignor in goods that are the subject of a consignment is a purchase money security interest in inventory.

In a transaction other than a consumer goods transaction, if the extent to which a security interest is a purchase money security interest depends on the application of a payment to a particular obligation, the payment must be applied

in accordance with any reasonable method of application to which the parties agree;

in the absence of the parties’ agreement to a reasonable method, in accordance with an intention of the obligor manifested at or before the time of payment; or

in the absence of an agreement to a reasonable method and a timely manifestation of the obligor’s intention, in the following order:

to obligations that are not secured; and

if more than one obligation is secured, to obligations secured by purchase money security interests in the order in which those obligations were incurred.

In a transaction, other than a consumer goods transaction, a purchase money security interest does not lose its status as such even if

the purchase money collateral also secures an obligation that is not a purchase money obligation;

collateral that is not purchase money collateral also secures the purchase money obligation; or

the purchase money obligation has been renewed, refinanced, consolidated, or restructured.

In a transaction other than a consumer goods transaction, a secured party claiming a purchase money security interest has the burden of establishing the extent to which the security interest is a purchase money security interest.

The limitation of the rules in (e) — (g) of this section to transactions other than consumer goods transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of the proper rules in consumer goods transactions. The court may not infer from that limitation the nature of the proper rule in consumer goods transactions and may continue to apply established approaches.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.104.
Control of deposit account.

A secured party has control of a deposit account if

the secured party is the bank with which the deposit account is maintained;

the debtor, secured party, and bank have agreed in an authenticated record that the bank will comply with instructions originated by the secured party directing disposition of the funds in the deposit account without further consent by the debtor; or

the secured party becomes the bank’s customer with respect to the deposit account.

A secured party that has satisfied (a) of this section has control even if the debtor retains the right to direct the disposition of funds from the deposit account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.105.
Control of electronic chattel paper.

A secured party has control of electronic chattel paper if a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper was assigned.

A system satisfies (a) of this section if the record or records comprising the chattel paper are created, stored, and assigned in such a manner that

a single authoritative copy of the record or records exists that is unique, identifiable, and, except as otherwise provided in (4) — (6) of this subsection, unalterable;

the authoritative copy identifies the secured party as the assignee of the record or records;

the authoritative copy is communicated to and maintained by the secured party or its designated custodian;

copies or amendments that add or change an identified assignee of the authoritative copy can be made only with the consent of the secured party;

each copy of the authoritative copy and any copy of a copy is readily identifiable as a copy that is not the authoritative copy; and

any amendment of the authoritative copy is readily identifiable as authorized or unauthorized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, reorganized the section, in (a), added “a system employed for evidencing the transfer of interests in the chattel paper reliably establishes the secured party as the person to which the chattel paper was assigned” at the end; in (b), added “A system satisfies (a) of this section if” at the beginning, in (b)(1) substituted “subsection” for “section” preceding “, unalterable”; made stylistic changes in (b)(4) — (b)(6).

Sec. 45.29.106.
Control of investment property.

A person has control of a certificated security, uncertificated security, or security entitlement as provided in AS

45.08.106

.

A secured party has control of a commodity contract if

the secured party is the commodity intermediary with which the commodity contract is carried; or

the commodity customer, secured party, and commodity intermediary have agreed that the commodity intermediary will apply any value distributed on account of the commodity contract as directed by the secured party without further consent by the commodity customer.

A secured party having control of all security entitlements or commodity contracts carried in a securities account or commodity account has control over the securities account or commodity account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.107.
Control of letter-of-credit right.

A secured party has control of a letter-of-credit right to the extent of any right to payment or performance by the issuer or a nominated person if the issuer or nominated person has consented to an assignment of proceeds of the letter of credit under AS

45.05.114(c)

or otherwise applicable law or practice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.108.
Sufficiency of description.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) — (e) of this section, a description of personal or real property is sufficient, whether or not it is specific, if it reasonably identifies what is described.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, a description of collateral reasonably identifies the collateral if it identifies the collateral by

specific listing;

category;

except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a type of collateral defined in the code;

quantity;

computational or allocational formula or procedure; or

except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, another method if the identity of the collateral is objectively determinable.

A description of collateral as “all the debtor’s assets” or “all the debtor’s personal property” or using words of similar import does not reasonably identify the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a description of a security entitlement, securities account, or commodity account is sufficient if it describes

the collateral by those terms or as investment property; or

the underlying financial asset or commodity contract.

A description only by type of collateral defined in the code is an insufficient description of

a commercial tort claim; or

in a consumer transaction, consumer goods, a security entitlement, a securities account, or a commodity account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)